North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 5. Procedures for Admission and Discharge of Clients.
§ 122C-301.
Assistance to an individual who is intoxicated in public; procedure for commitment to shelter or facility.

An officer may assist an individual found intoxicated in a public place by taking any of the following actions:

The officer may direct or transport the intoxicated individual home;

The officer may direct or transport the intoxicated individual to the residence of another individual willing to accept him;

If the intoxicated individual is apparently in need of and apparently unable to provide for himself food, clothing, or shelter but is not apparently in need of immediate medical care, the officer may direct or transport him to an appropriate public or private shelter facility;

If the intoxicated individual is apparently in need of but apparently unable to provide for himself immediate medical care, the officer may direct or transport him to an area facility, hospital, or physician’s office; or the officer may direct or transport the individual to any other appropriate health care facility; or

If the intoxicated individual is apparently a substance abuser and is apparently dangerous to himself or others, the officer may proceed as provided in Part 8 of this Article.

In providing the assistance authorized by subsection (a) of this section, the officer may use reasonable force to restrain the intoxicated individual if it appears necessary to protect himself, the intoxicated individual, or others. No officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for assault, false imprisonment, or other torts or crimes on account of reasonable measures taken under authority of this Part.

If the officer takes the action described in either subdivision (a)(3) or (a)(4) of this section, the facility to which the intoxicated individual is taken may detain him only until he becomes sober or a maximum of 24 hours. The individual may stay a longer period if he wishes to do so and the facility is able to accommodate him.

Any individual who has knowledge that a person assisted to a shelter or other facility under subdivisions (a)(3) or (a)(4) of this section is a substance abuser and is dangerous to himself or others may proceed as provided in Part 8 of this Article.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1134, s. 2; 1981, c. 519, s. 5; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-302.
Cities and counties may employ officers to assist intoxicated individuals.

A city or county may employ officers to assist individuals who are intoxicated in public. Officers employed for this purpose shall be trained to give assistance to those who are intoxicated in public including the administration of first aid. An officer employed by a city or county to assist intoxicated individuals has the powers and duties set out in

G.S. 122C-301

within the same territory in which criminal laws are enforced by law-enforcement officers of that city or county.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1134, s. 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-303.
Use of jail for care for intoxicated individual.

In addition to the actions authorized by

G.S. 122C-301(a)

, an officer may assist an individual found intoxicated in a public place by directing or transporting that individual to a city or county jail. That action may be taken only if the intoxicated individual is apparently in need of and apparently unable to provide for himself food, clothing, or shelter but is not apparently in need of immediate medical care and if no other facility is readily available to receive him. The officer and employees of the jail are exempt from liability as provided in

G.S. 122C-301(b)

. The intoxicated individual may be detained at the jail only until he becomes sober or a maximum of 24 hours and may be released at any time to a relative or other individual willing to be responsible for his care.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1134, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§§ 122C-304 through 122C-310.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 10. Voluntary Admissions, Involuntary Commitments and Discharges, Inmates and Parolees, Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

§ 122C-311.
Individuals on parole. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Any individual who has been released from any correctional facility on parole is admitted, committed and discharged from facilities in accordance with the procedures specified in this Article for other individuals.

History.

1959, c. 1002, s. 24; 1963, c. 1184, s. 28; 1973, c. 253, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-312.
Voluntary admissions and discharges of inmates of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Inmates in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may seek voluntary admission to State facilities for the mentally ill or substance abusers. The provisions of Part 2 of this Article shall apply except that an admission may be accomplished only when the Secretary and the Secretary of Public Safety jointly agree to the inmate’s request. When an inmate is admitted he shall be discharged in accordance with the provisions of Part 2 of this Article except that an inmate who is ready for discharge, but still under a term of incarceration, shall be discharged only to an official of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is responsible for the security and cost of transporting inmates to and from facilities under the provisions of this section.

History.

1979, c. 547; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(ppppp).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ppppp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the section heading and throughout the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 criminal law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1350 (1980).

§ 122C-313.
Inmate becoming mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

An inmate who becomes mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others after incarceration in any facility operated by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in the State is processed in accordance with Part 7 of this Article, as modified by this section, except when the provisions of Part 7 are manifestly inappropriate. A staff psychiatrist or eligible psychologist of the correctional facility shall execute the affidavit required by

G.S. 122C-261

and send it to the clerk of superior court of the county in which the correctional facility is located. Upon receipt of the affidavit, the clerk shall calendar a district court hearing and notify the respondent and his counsel as required by G.S. 122C-284(a). The hearing is conducted in a district courtroom. If the judge finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent is mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others, he shall order him transferred for treatment to a State facility designated by the Secretary. The judge shall not order outpatient commitment for an inmate-respondent.

If the sentence of an inmate-respondent expires while he is committed to a State facility, he is considered in all respects as if he had been initially committed under Part 7 of this Article.

If the sentence of an inmate-respondent has not expired, and if in the opinion of the attending physician of the State facility an inmate-respondent ceases to be mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others, he shall notify the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety which shall arrange for the inmate-respondent’s return to a correctional facility.

Special counsel at a State facility shall represent any inmate who becomes mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others while confined in a correctional facility in the same county, otherwise counsel is assigned in accordance with G.S. 122C-270(d).

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is responsible for the security and cost of transporting inmates to and from State facilities under the provisions of this section.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 66; Rev., s. 4619; C.S., s. 6238; 1923, c. 165, s. 55; 1945, c. 952, s. 55; 1955, c. 887, s. 14; 1957, c. 1232, s. 26; 1963, c. 1184, s. 27; 1965, c. 800, s. 13; 1973, c. 253, s. 3; c. 1433; 1977, c. 679, s. 8; 1979, c. 358, s. 27; c. 915, s. 11; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(ppppp).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ppppp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Convict Committed to Hospital for Mentally Ill May Be Paroled from Department of Correction Commitment.

See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Wade E. Brown, N.C. Board of Paroles, 41 N.C.A.G. 550 (1971), rendered under former statutory provisions.

§§ 122C-314 through 122C-320.
[Effective until January 1, 2023]

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 10. Voluntary Admissions, Involuntary Commitments and Discharges, Inmates and Parolees, Department of Adult Correction. [Effective January 1, 2023]

§ 122C-311.
Individuals on parole. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Any individual who has been released from any correctional facility on parole is admitted, committed and discharged from facilities in accordance with the procedures specified in this Article for other individuals.

History.

1959, c. 1002, s. 24; 1963, c. 1184, s. 28; 1973, c. 253, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-312.
Voluntary admissions and discharges of inmates of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction [Effective January 1, 2023]

Inmates in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may seek voluntary admission to State facilities for the mentally ill or substance abusers. The provisions of Part 2 of this Article shall apply except that an admission may be accomplished only when the Secretary and the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction jointly agree to the inmate’s request. When an inmate is admitted he shall be discharged in accordance with the provisions of Part 2 of this Article except that an inmate who is ready for discharge, but still under a term of incarceration, shall be discharged only to an official of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction is responsible for the security and cost of transporting inmates to and from facilities under the provisions of this section.

History.

1979, c. 547; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(ppppp); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p) effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ppppp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the section heading and throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the second sentence, and “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the section heading, and in the first, third and last sentences. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 criminal law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1350 (1980).

§ 122C-313.
Inmate becoming mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others. [Effective January 1, 2023]

An inmate who becomes mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others after incarceration in any facility operated by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in the State is processed in accordance with Part 7 of this Article, as modified by this section, except when the provisions of Part 7 are manifestly inappropriate. A staff psychiatrist or eligible psychologist of the correctional facility shall execute the affidavit required by

G.S. 122C-261

and send it to the clerk of superior court of the county in which the correctional facility is located. Upon receipt of the affidavit, the clerk shall calendar a district court hearing and notify the respondent and his counsel as required by G.S. 122C-284(a). The hearing is conducted in a district courtroom. If the judge finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent is mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others, he shall order him transferred for treatment to a State facility designated by the Secretary. The judge shall not order outpatient commitment for an inmate-respondent.

If the sentence of an inmate-respondent expires while he is committed to a State facility, he is considered in all respects as if he had been initially committed under Part 7 of this Article.

If the sentence of an inmate-respondent has not expired, and if in the opinion of the attending physician of the State facility an inmate-respondent ceases to be mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others, he shall notify the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction which shall arrange for the inmate-respondent’s return to a correctional facility.

Special counsel at a State facility shall represent any inmate who becomes mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others while confined in a correctional facility in the same county, otherwise counsel is assigned in accordance with G.S. 122C-270(d).

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction is responsible for the security and cost of transporting inmates to and from State facilities under the provisions of this section.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 66; Rev., s. 4619; C.S., s. 6238; 1923, c. 165, s. 55; 1945, c. 952, s. 55; 1955, c. 887, s. 14; 1957, c. 1232, s. 26; 1963, c. 1184, s. 27; 1965, c. 800, s. 13; 1973, c. 253, s. 3; c. 1433; 1977, c. 679, s. 8; 1979, c. 358, s. 27; c. 915, s. 11; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(ppppp); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ppppp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in subsections (a), (c) and (e). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Convict Committed to Hospital for Mentally Ill May Be Paroled from Department of Correction Commitment.

See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Wade E. Brown, N.C. Board of Paroles, 41 N.C.A.G. 550 (1971), rendered under former statutory provisions.

§§ 122C-314 through 122C-320.
[Effective January 1, 2023]

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 11. Voluntary Admissions, Involuntary Commitments and Discharges, the Psychiatric Service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill.

§ 122C-321.
Voluntary admissions and discharges.

Any individual in need of treatment for mental illness or substance abuse may seek voluntary admission to the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill. Procedures for admission and discharge shall be made in accordance with Parts 2 through 4 of this Article. The applicant may be admitted only upon the approval of the director of the psychiatric service or his designee.

History.

1955, c. 1274, s. 2; 1963, c. 1184, s. 2; 1973, c. 723, s. 3; c. 1084; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 141, s. 14.

§ 122C-322.
Involuntary commitments.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section references in Parts 6 through 8 of this Article to 24-hour facilities, outpatient treatment centers, or area authorities, or private facilities shall include the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill. The psychiatric service may be used for temporary detention pending a district court hearing, for commitment of the respondent after the hearing, or as the manager and supervisor of outpatient commitment. However, no individual may be held at or committed to the psychiatric service without the prior approval of the director of the psychiatric service or his designee.

Initial hearings, supplemental hearings, and rehearings may be held at the psychiatric service facility or at any place in Orange County where district court can be held under

G.S. 7A-133

. Legal counsel for the respondent at all hearings and rehearings shall be assigned from among the members of the bar of the same county in accordance with G.S. 122C-270(d).

History.

1977, c. 738, s. 1; 1981, c. 442; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 141, s. 15.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “One Size Only Fits Some: Presuming Custody for the Involuntarily Committed,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 1014 (2019).

§§ 122C-323 through 122C-330.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 12. Voluntary Admissions, Involuntary Commitments and Discharges, Veterans Administration Facilities.

§ 122C-331.
Voluntary admissions and discharges.

Veterans in need of treatment for mental illness or substance abuse may seek voluntary admission to a facility operated by the Veterans Administration. Procedures for admission and discharge shall be made in accordance with Parts 2 and 4 of this Article. The Veterans Administration may require additional procedures not inconsistent with these Parts.

History.

1973, c. 1408, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-332.
Involuntary commitments.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, references in Parts 6 through 8 of this Article to 24-hour facilities, outpatient treatment centers, or area authorities, or private facilities shall include the facilities operated by the Veterans Administration. Veterans Administration facilities may be used for temporary detention pending a district court hearing, for commitment of the respondent after the hearing, or as the manager and supervisor of outpatient commitment. Eligibility of the veteran-respondent for treatment at a Veterans Administration facility and the availability of space shall be determined by the Veterans Administration in all cases before sending or committing a veteran-respondent.

Initial hearings, supplemental hearings, and rehearings for veteran-respondents may be held at the facility or at the county courthouse in the county in which the facility is located, and counsel shall be assigned from among the members of the bar of the same county in accordance with G.S. 122C-270(d).

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-333.
Order of another state.

The judgment or order of commitment by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state, committing a person to the Veterans Administration or another federal agency that is located in this State shall have the same force and effect on the committed person while in this State as in the jurisdiction of the court entering the judgment or making the order. The courts of the committing state shall retain jurisdiction of the person so committed for the purpose of inquiring into the mental condition of the person, and for determining the necessity for continuance of his restraint. Consent is given to the application of the law of the committing state on the authority of the chief officer of any facility of the Veterans Administration or of any institution operated in this State by any other federal agency to retain custody, transfer, parole, or discharge the committed person.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§§ 122C-334 through 122C-340.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 13. Voluntary Admissions, Involuntary Commitment and Discharge of Non-State Residents and the Return of North Carolina Resident Clients.

§ 122C-341.
Determination of residence.

It is the responsibility of the facility to determine if a client is not a resident of the State.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 18; Rev., ss. 3591, 4587, 4588; C.S., ss. 6187, 6188; 1945, c. 952, ss. 16, 17; 1947, c. 537, s. 11; 1953, c. 256, s. 3; 1957, c. 1386; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1973, c. 673, s. 13; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-342.
Voluntary admissions and discharges.

A non-State resident may be admitted to and discharged from a facility on a voluntary basis in accordance with Parts 2 through 5 of this Article at his own expense. If the facility determines that the client should be returned to his own state the provisions of

G.S. 122C-345

or

G.S. 122C-361

, as appropriate, shall apply.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 16; Rev., s. 4584; C.S., s. 6210; 1945, c. 952, s. 33; 1947, c. 537, s. 18; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1971, c. 1140; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, s. 13; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-343.
Involuntary commitments.

Involuntary commitments of non-State residents are made under the provisions of Parts 6 through 8 of this Article. If after commitment to a 24-hour facility the facility determines that the respondent needs long-term care and should be returned to his state of residence, the provisions of

G.S. 122C-345

or

G.S. 122C-361

, as appropriate, shall apply.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 16; Rev., s. 4584; C.S., s. 6210; 1945, c. 952, s. 33; 1947, c. 537, s. 18; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1971, c. 1140; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, s. 13; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-344.
Citizens of other countries.

In addition to the provisions of

G.S. 122C-341

through

G.S. 122C-343

, if a 24-hour facility determines that a client is not a citizen of the United States, the facility shall notify the Governor of this State of the name of the client, the country and place of his residence in the country and other facts in the case as can be obtained, together with a copy of pertinent medical records. The Governor shall send the information to the nearest consular office of the committed foreign national, with the request that the consular office tell the minister resident or plenipotentiary of the country of which the client is alleged to be a citizen.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 16; Rev., s. 4585; C.S., s. 6211; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1993, c. 561, s. 86(a).

§ 122C-345.
Return of a non-State resident client to his resident state.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, it is the responsibility of the director of a facility to arrange for the transfer of a client to his resident state. The cost of returning the client to his resident state is the responsibility of the client or his family.

A non-State resident client of an area 24-hour facility may be transferred to a State facility in accordance with

G.S. 122C-206

in order for the client to be returned to his resident state.

A non-State resident client of a State facility may be returned to his resident state under procedures established under

G.S. 122C-346

or

G.S. 122C-361

. The cost of returning a client to his resident state under this subsection shall be the responsibility of the State.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 16; Rev., s. 4584; C.S., s. 6210; 1945, c. 952, s. 33; 1947, c. 537, ss. 18, 20; 1955, c. 887, s. 13; 1959, c. 1002, s. 22; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1971, c. 1140; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, s. 13; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-346.
Authority of the Secretary to enter reciprocal agreements.

The Secretary may enter agreements with other states for the return of non-State resident clients to their resident state and for the return of North Carolina residents to North Carolina when under treatment in another state.

History.

1947, c. 537, s. 20; 1955, c. 887, s. 13; 1959, c. 1002, s. 22; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-347.
Return of North Carolina resident clients from other states.

North Carolina residents who are in treatment in another state may be returned to North Carolina either under an agreement authorized in

G.S. 122C-346

or under the provisions of

G.S. 122C-361

. The cost of returning a North Carolina resident to this State is the responsibility of the sending state. Within 72 hours after admission in a State facility, a returned resident shall be evaluated. The returned resident may agree to a voluntary admission or may be released, or proceedings for an involuntary commitment under this Article may be initiated as necessary by the responsible professional in the facility.

History.

1945, c. 952, s. 34; 1947, c. 537, s. 19; 1959, c. 1002, ss. 20, 21; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1965, c. 800, s. 9; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, ss. 133, 138; c. 673, s. 13; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-348.
Residency not affected.

A nonresident of this State who is under care in a 24-hour facility in this State is not considered a resident. No length of time spent in this State while a client in a 24-hour facility is sufficient to make a nonresident a resident or entitled to care or treatment.

A North Carolina resident who is under care and treatment in a 24-hour facility in another state shall retain his residency in North Carolina.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 18; Rev., ss. 3591, 4587, 4588; C.S., ss. 6187, 6188; 1945, c. 952, ss. 16, 17; 1947, c. 537, ss. 11, 20; 1953, c. 256, s. 3; 1955, c. 887, s. 13; 1957, c. 1386; 1959, c. 1002, s. 22; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, s. 13; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§§ 122C-349 through 122C-360.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 14. Interstate Compact on Mental Health.